Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2173.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 42-16252, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16252. Notice of proposed correction; response; petition for review; appeal; electronic communication A. Subject to the limitations and conditions prescribed by this article, if a tax officer determines that any real or personal property has been assessed improperly as a result of a property tax error, the tax officer shall send the taxpayer a notice of proposed correction at the taxpayer's last known address by: 1. Certified mail, return receipt requested, if correction of the error results in an increase in the full cash value or change in legal classification of the property. 2. First class mail or, at the taxpayer's written request, delivery by common carrier or electronic transmittal, if correction of the error does not result in an increase in the valuation of the property. B. The notice shall: 1. Be in a form prescribed by the department. 2. Clearly identify the subject property by tax parcel number or tax roll number and the year or years for which the correction is proposed. 3. Explain the error, the reasons for the error and the proposed correction of the error. 4. Inform the taxpayer of the procedure and deadlines for appealing all or part of the proposed determination before the tax roll is corrected. C. Within thirty days after receiving a notice of proposed correction, the taxpayer may file a written response to the tax officer that sent the notice to either consent to or dispute the proposed correction of the error and to state the grounds for disputing the correction. A failure to file a written response within thirty days constitutes consent to the proposed correction.  A taxpayer may file a request for an extension of time within thirty days after receiving the notice of proposed correction. The extension of time may not exceed thirty days. If an extension is granted, any response that is not filed within the extended due date constitutes consent to the proposed correction. D. The taxpayer may appeal any valuation or legal classification issue that arises from the proposed correction as provided in this section. E. If the taxpayer consents to the proposed correction, or consents to the proposed correction but disputes the proposed valuation or legal classification as provided on the form prescribed by the department, the tax roll shall be promptly corrected to allow property taxes to be levied and collected in all subsequent tax years, but no additional tax, interest or penalty may be imposed for the current tax year or any tax year preceding the date of the notice of proposed correction. F. If the taxpayer disputes the proposed correction or the proposed valuation or legal classification, the tax officer shall meet with the taxpayer or the taxpayer's representative in any case in which the taxpayer has timely filed a written response to discuss the proposed correction. If after the meeting the tax officer and the taxpayer reach an agreement on all or part of the proposed correction, the tax officer and the taxpayer shall each sign an agreement and the tax roll must be promptly corrected to the extent agreed on. G. If after the meeting the parties fail to agree on all or part of the proposed correction, the tax officer shall serve a notice on the taxpayer by certified mail within thirty days after the meeting date advising the taxpayer that the tax roll will be corrected to the extent agreed on.  The taxpayer may file a petition on a form prescribed by the department with the board of equalization within thirty days after the date of the notice or it is barred. On receiving the petition, the board shall hold a hearing on the disputed issues in the proposed correction within thirty days and shall issue a written decision pursuant to the board's rules. H. A party that is dissatisfied with the decision of the board may appeal the decision to court within sixty days after the date the board's decision is mailed, but any additional taxes that are determined to be due must be timely paid before delinquency for the court to retain jurisdiction of the matter. I. The tax officer may accept an electronic response to a notice of proposed correction from a taxpayer.  If the taxpayer elects to submit the response electronically, the tax officer shall provide an acknowledgment or response of receipt to the taxpayer and may provide related communications electronically, except for any notice that is required to be served by certified mail pursuant to subsection G of this section.  The time limits and procedural requirements that apply to written communications under this section apply to electronic communications allowed under this subsection. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 42-16254, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-16254. Notice of claim; response; petition for review; appeal; electronic communication A. If a taxpayer believes that the taxpayer's property has been assessed improperly as a result of a property tax error, the taxpayer shall file a notice of claim with the appropriate tax officer, either personally, electronically or by certified mail, as follows: 1. If the alleged error concerns the valuation or classification of property by the county assessor, the notice shall be filed with the assessor. On receiving the notice, the assessor shall immediately transmit a copy to the department. 2. If the alleged error concerns the valuation or classification of property by the department, the notice shall be filed with the department. 3. If the alleged error concerns the imposition of any tax rate, the notice shall be filed with the county board of supervisors. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall notify each affected taxing entity to allow the entity to file a response to the claim. B. The notice shall: 1. Be in a form prescribed by the department. 2. Clearly identify the subject property by tax parcel number or tax roll number and the year or years for which the correction is proposed. 3. State the claim and the evidence to support the claim for correcting the alleged error. C. Within sixty days after receiving a notice of claim, the tax officer may file a written response to the taxpayer to either consent to or dispute the error and to state the grounds for disputing the error. A failure to file a written response within sixty days constitutes consent to the error, and the board of supervisors shall direct the county treasurer to correct the tax roll on the taxpayer's written demand supported by proof of the date of the notice of claim and the tax officer's failure to timely dispute the error. D. If the tax officer disputes the error, the tax officer shall notify the taxpayer of a time and place for a meeting between a representative of the tax officer and the taxpayer or the taxpayer's representative within sixty days to discuss the basis for the dispute. E. If, after the meeting, the parties agree on all or part of the notice of claim, the tax roll must be corrected promptly to the extent agreed on and any taxes that have been overpaid shall be refunded pursuant to section 42-16259. F. If the parties fail to agree on all or part of the notice of claim, the taxpayer may file a petition with the board of equalization on a form prescribed by the department and shall send a copy to the tax officer by certified mail. The petition must be filed with the board within ninety days after the date of the meeting or it is barred. On receiving the petition, the board shall hold a hearing on the disputed issues in the notice of claim within thirty days and shall issue a written decision pursuant to the board's rules. G. A party that is dissatisfied with the decision of the board may appeal the decision to court within sixty days after the date the board's decision is mailed, but any additional taxes that are determined to be due must be timely paid before delinquency for the court to retain jurisdiction of the matter. In addition, in order for a taxpayer to recover a refund for taxes paid in a preceding tax year as a result of an error, all taxes that were levied and assessed against the property for the tax year must be paid before delinquency in order for the court to retain jurisdiction of the matter. H. If a tax officer accepts electronic notice of claim from a taxpayer, the tax officer shall provide an electronic acknowledgement of receipt to the taxpayer. H. The tax officer may accept an electronic notice of claim from a taxpayer. If the taxpayer elects to submit the notice of claim electronically, the tax officer shall provide an acknowledgment or response of receipt to the taxpayer and may provide related communications electronically, except for any communication that is required to be served by certified mail pursuant to subsection F of this section.  The time limits and procedural requirements that apply to written communications under this section apply to electronic communications allowed under this subsection. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR APRIL 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE APRIL 13, 2026.